Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-311
Mayor; territorial jurisdiction.

The mayor of a city of the primary class shall have such jurisdiction as may be vested in him or her by ordinance, over all places within the city of the primary class or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, for the enforcement of the health ordinances and regulations thereof, and for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of all such ordinances, except that the ordinances respecting taxation shall not be enforced outside of the corporate limits of such city of the primary class.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 25, p. 78;

R.S.1913, § 4488;

C.S.1922, § 3874;

C.S.1929, § 15-311;

R.S.1943, § 15-311;

Laws 1967, c. 57, § 3, p. 194;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 90.